Connecticut, session 2026, SB00019.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of ____ dollars be appropriated to the Department of
Education, from the General Fund, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2027, for school-based mental health services in rural areas in the
northwest part of the state.